src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
! Verb inflection
! Nganasan verb conjugate.

LEXICON V-munsa
 VERB ;

LEXICON VERB
+Prt+Sc3Sg:%>уˮо # ;
+Prt+Sc3Sg:%>унту # ;

!каркытуса:каркыту
LEXICON V-karkytusa
V+Ind+Ipf+ScSg1:%>ндум K ;
V+Ind+Ipf+ScSg2:%>ндуӊ K ;
V+Ind+Ipf+ScSg3:%>ту K ;
V+Ind+Ipf+ScDu1:%>туми K ;
V+Ind+Ipf+ScDu2:%>тури	K ;
V+Ind+Ipf+ScDu3:%>тугәй K ;
V+Ind+Ipf+ScPl1:%>тумуˮ	K ;
V+Ind+Ipf+ScPl2:%>туруˮ	K ;
V+Ind+Ipf+ScPl3:%>ндуˮ	K ;

!басудя:басу
LEXICON V-basudja
V+Ind+Ipf+ScSg1:%>тум	K ;
V+Ind+Ipf+ScSg2:%>туӊ	K ;
V+Ind+Ipf+ScSg3:%>ту	K ;
V+Ind+Ipf+ScDu1:%>туми	K ;
V+Ind+Ipf+ScDu2:%>тури	K ;
V+Ind+Ipf+ScDu3:%>тугәй K ;
V+Ind+Ipf+ScPl1:%>тумуˮ	K ;
V+Ind+Ipf+ScPl2:%>туруˮ	K ;
V+Ind+Ipf+ScPl3:%>туˮ	K ;




! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
